New York, session 2025-2026, S2297.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 160.60 of the criminal procedure law, as amended by 2 chapter 877 of the laws of 1976, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 160.60 Effect of termination of criminal actions in favor of the 4 accused. 5 1. Upon the termination of a criminal action or proceeding against a 6 person in favor of such person, as defined in subdivision [two] three of 7 section 160.50 of this [chapter] article, the arrest and prosecution 8 shall be deemed a nullity and the accused shall be restored, in contem- 9 plation of law, to the status [he] such person occupied before the 10 arrest and prosecution. The arrest or prosecution shall not operate as a 11 disqualification of any person so accused to pursue or engage in any 12 lawful activity, occupation, profession, or calling. Except where 13 specifically required or permitted by statute or upon specific authori- 14 zation of a superior court, no such person shall be required to divulge 15 information pertaining to the arrest or prosecution. 16 2. Upon the termination of a criminal action or proceeding against a 17 minor pursuant to section 160.50 of this article, all photographs, fing- 18 erprints, palmprints, and arrest records related to such action or 19 proceeding shall be expunged only if such minor has no prior arrest 20 record. For purposes of this article, "minor" shall have the same mean- 21 ing as juvenile offender as defined by subdivision forty-two of section 22 1.20 of this chapter. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03914-01-5